Washington statutes.
RCW 4.100.090

Actions for compensation.

Except as provided in RCW 4.100.070, an action for compensation under this chapter must be commenced within three years after the grant of a pardon, the grant of judicial relief and satisfaction of other conditions described in RCW 4.100.020, or release from custody, whichever is later. However, any action by the state challenging or appealing the grant of judicial relief or release from custody tolls the three-year period. Any persons meeting the criteria set forth in RCW 4.100.020 who was wrongly convicted before July 28, 2013, may commence an action under this chapter within three years after July 28, 2013.

[ 2013 c 175 s 9.]